Hawaii statutes.
§342L-14 Fees. Notwithstanding section
342L-36.5 to the contrary, the director may establish reasonable fees for the
registration of underground storage tanks or tank systems, for the issuance,
renewal, and modification of permits and variances to cover the cost of
issuance thereof and for the implementation and enforcement of the terms and
conditions of permits and variances including inspections and necessary site
visits (not including court costs or other costs associated with any formal
enforcement action), and for the review, evaluation, and approval of plans
regarding release response activities. The fees shall be deposited to the
credit of the general fund. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §6; am L 1992, c 259, §16]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Section 342L-36.5 referred to in text is repealed.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next